Hawaii, session 2026, SB2665.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 286-107, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows: "(e)  No driver's license shall be renewed by the examiner of drivers unless: (1)  The examiner of drivers is satisfied of the applicant's fitness to continue to operate a motor vehicle; (2)  If the applicant has received a moving violation within the previous five years from the date that the applicant files for renewal, completes an educational course that includes: (A)  An online road safety video developed by the department of transportation; and (B)  A written road safety examination that tests an applicant's: (i)  Ability to understand highway signs regulating, warning, and directing traffic; (ii)  Knowledge of the rules of the road based on the state traffic laws and county traffic ordinances where the applicant resides or intends to operate a motor vehicle, including any new or amended state traffic laws and county traffic ordinances; (iii)  Knowledge and understanding of information relating to driver safety and collision reduction as determined by the department; and (iv)  Any other knowledge of the rules of the road that the department of transportation deems necessary to determine the applicant's fitness to continue to operate a motor vehicle; [(2)] (3)  The fee required by subsection (d) is tendered together with the application for renewal; [(3)] (4)  The applicant complies with section 286-102.5; and [(4)] (5)  The examiner of drivers is satisfied that the applicant does not have outstanding charges and fines relating to the disposition of an abandoned vehicle. For the purposes of this subsection, "moving violation" means a violation of state traffic laws or county traffic ordinances committed by a driver while the motor vehicle is in motion, including moving violations under chapter 291C. "Moving violation" does not include parking violations and violations that do not involve the operation of a motor vehicle in motion." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2027.